Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
172

LAND
COMMISSION AWARDS; SURVEYS

Section

172-1 Department to list lands on which
commutation payable;

public notice; notice to pay

172-2 Department to appraise lands; determine
commutation;

interest; lien

172-3 Enforcement of payment

172-4 General default

172-5 Hearing, foreclosure

172-6 Proof

172-7 Unsurveyed lands; listing by comptroller

172-8 Notice to owners to have boundaries
determined

172-9 Upon failure of owners, comptroller to
have boundaries

determined at owner's expense

172-10 Enforcement of payment of expenses by
owners

172-11 Land patents on land commission awards; to
whom, for

whose benefit

172-12 Land patents issued after boundary and
commutation

settled

172-13 Destruction, defacing or removal of survey
monuments;

penalty

Cross References

Environmental courts,
jurisdiction over proceedings arising under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Rules of Court

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(b)(12).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next